Utah statutes.
31A-40-308.   Material changes.

A professional employer organization shall notify the commissioner within 30 days of a change in:

(1)  ownership;

(2)  an address or telephone number;

(3)  a contact person; or

(4)  business email address at which the commissioner may contact the professional employer organization.



Enacted by Chapter 284, 2011 General Session

